Washington statutes.
RCW 18.108.240

Chapter 277, Laws of 2002—Review/regulatory changes.

The department of health shall review the implementation of chapter 277, Laws of 2002 and make recommendations to the legislature by December 1, 2005, regarding regulatory changes to chapter 277, Laws of 2002.

[ 2002 c 277 s 3.]